dicts/oc_FR/oc_FR.aff
SFX j  Y 40 
SFX j   r         0             ir
SFX j   ir         es             ir
SFX j   ir         0              ir
SFX j   ir         èm           ir
SFX j   ir         ètz           ir
SFX j   ir         on            ir
SFX j   ir         iái             ir
SFX j   ir         iás             ir
SFX j   ir         iá              ir
SFX j   ir         iam             ir
SFX j   ir         iatz             ir
SFX j   ir         ián              ir
SFX j   ir         iguèri          ir
SFX j   ir         iguères        ir
SFX j   ir         iguèt            ir
SFX j   ir         iguèrem       ir
SFX j   ir         iguèretz       ir
SFX j   ir         iguèron        ir
SFX j   0         ai                 ir
SFX j   0         às                 ir
SFX j   0         à                  ir
SFX j   0         em               ir
SFX j   ir         etz               ir
SFX j   ir         àn                ir
SFX j   ir         a                 ir
SFX j   ir         as                ir
SFX j   ir         am               ir
SFX j   ir         atz               ir
SFX j   ir         an                ir
SFX j   ir         iguèsse        ir
SFX j   ir         iguèsses       ir
SFX j   ir         iguèssem      ir
SFX j   ir         iguessetz      ir
SFX j   ir         iguèsson       ir
SFX j   0         iái                 ir
SFX j   0         iás                 ir
SFX j   0         iá                  ir
SFX j   0         iam               ir
SFX j   ir         iatz               ir
SFX j   ir         ián                ir

SFX r Y 11
SFX r    eirar      ièiri          eirar
SFX r   eirar      ièiras        eirar
SFX r    eirar      ièira          eirar
SFX r    eirar      eiram        eirar
SFX r    eirar      eiratz        eirar
SFX r    eirar      ièiran        eirar
SFX r    eirar      ièire          eirar
SFX r    eirar      ièires          eirar
SFX r    eirar      eirem        eirar
SFX r    eirar      eiretz        eirar
SFX r    eirar      ièiren        eirar

SFX p Y 5
SFX p    r       t          r
SFX p    r      da         r
SFX p    r       ts         r
SFX p    r      das       r
SFX p    r       nt         r

SFX t Y 42
SFX t    re      i           re
SFX t    re      es          re
SFX t    re     0            re
SFX t   dre     t            [aeiou]dre
SFX t    re      èm          re
SFX t    re      ètz          re
SFX t    re      on           re
SFX t    re      iái           re
SFX t    re      iás           re
SFX t    re      iá            re
SFX t    re      iam         re
SFX t    re      iatz         re
SFX t    re      ián          re
SFX t    re      èri           re
SFX t    re      ères         re
SFX t    re      èt            re
SFX t    re      èrem       re
SFX t    re      èretz        re
SFX t    re      èron         re
SFX t    e       ai              re
SFX t    e      às              re
SFX t    e      à               re
SFX t    e      rem           re
SFX t    e      retz           re
SFX t    e      àn             re
SFX t    e      iái             re
SFX t    e      iás             re
SFX t    e      iá              re
SFX t    e      iam           re
SFX t    e      iatz           re
SFX t    e      ián           re
SFX t    re      a              re
SFX t    re      as            re
SFX t    re      am           re
SFX t    re      atz           re
SFX t    re      an            re
SFX t    re      èsse         re
SFX t    re      èsses        re
SFX t    re      èsse         re
SFX t    re      èssem      re
SFX t    re      èssetz      re
SFX t    re      èsson       re

SFX u Y 90
SFX u   i         es           i
SFX u   gui     c          gui
SFX u   i          0         [mpnl]i
SFX u   di       t          [oòè]di
SFX u  bi        p          bi
SFX u   i         0          [r]di
SFX u   si        i           [^iuos][s]i
SFX u   i          0          nhi
SFX u   si        s           osi
SFX u   si        tz         risi
SFX u  si         tz         [^aò]usi
SFX u  si         tz         disi
SFX u  isi        ís          [^dr]isi
SFX u  i          0           [^r]ri
SFX u  ri         0           rri
SFX u  i          0           lvi
SFX u  si         0          issi
SFX u   si        0          aussi
SFX u   i        0          òusi
SFX u   vi        u          [v]i
SFX u   zi        s           zi
SFX u   ci        ç          ci
SFX u   ci        çon      ci
SFX u   i         on         i
SFX u   i        a            [oè]di
SFX u   i        as          [oè]di
SFX u   i        an          [oè]di
SFX u   ui       a           [^vm]i
SFX u   ui       as         [^vm]i
SFX u   ui       an         [^vm]i
SFX u   i         a           mi
SFX u   i         as          mi
SFX u   i         an          mi
SFX u   si        ga         [^c][^o][s]i
SFX u   si        gas       [^c][^o][s]i
SFX u   si        gan       [^c][^o][s]i
SFX u   vi        ga         [v]i
SFX u   vi        gas        [v]i
SFX u   vi        gan        [v]i
SFX u   ivi      isca         vivi
SFX u   ivi      iscas       vivi
SFX u   ivi      iscan       vivi
SFX u   si       ja            vesi
SFX u   si       jas           vesi
SFX u   si       jan          vesi
SFX u   i         ga          [^r]ni
SFX u   i         gas         [^r]ni
SFX u   i         gan         [^r]ni
SFX u   i         a             ni
SFX u   i         as            ni
SFX u   i         an           ni
SFX u   i         ga            li
SFX u   i         gas          li
SFX u   i         gan          li
SFX u   si       sa            tasi
SFX u   si       sas          tasi
SFX u   si       san          tasi
SFX u   si       sa             cosi
SFX u   si       sas           cosi
SFX u   si       san          cosi
SFX u   issi     sca          issi
SFX u   issi     scas         issi
SFX u   issi     scan        issi
SFX u   hi       ga           nhi
SFX u   hi       gas          nhi
SFX u   hi       gan          nhi
SFX u   i         a             rri
SFX u   i         as            rri
SFX u   i         an            rri
SFX u   i         a             ièri
SFX u   i         as            ièri
SFX u   i         an            ièri
SFX u   i         a              usi
SFX u   i         as            usi
SFX u   i         an            usi
SFX u   i         a              zi
SFX u   i         as             zi
SFX u   i         an             zi
SFX u   i         a               ci
SFX u   i         as              ci
SFX u   i         an             ci
SFX u   ci       ça             òrci
SFX u   ci       ças           òrci
SFX u   ci       çan          òrci
SFX u   i        a               [r]di
SFX u   i        as             [r]di
SFX u   i        an             [r]di
SFX u   di      sca            òdi
SFX u   di      scas          òdi
SFX u   di      scan          òdi
